Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7215.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 9-31-2 and 9-31-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 9-31 entitled
"Governmental Tort Liability" are hereby amended to read as follows:
9-31-2. Limitations of damages — State.
In any tort action against the state of Rhode Island or any political subdivision thereof, any
damages recovered therein shall not exceed the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000);
provided, however, that in all instances in which the state was engaged in a proprietary function in
the commission of the tort, or in any situation whereby the state has agreed to indemnify the federal
government or any agency thereof for any tort liability, the limitation on damages set forth in this
section shall not apply that all claims of willful and malicious conduct, or extreme recklessness
shall not be subject to a limitation on damages. The State of Rhode Island shall not be subject to
the provisions of § 9-21-10.
9-31-3. Limitation of damages — Cities, towns, and fire districts.
In any tort action against any city or town or any fire district, any damages recovered
therein shall not exceed the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); provided, however,
that in all instances in which the city or town or fire district was engaged in a proprietary function
in the commission of the tort, the limitation of damages set forth in this section shall not apply that
all claims of willful and malicious conduct, or extreme recklessness shall not be subject to a
limitation on damages. Any city or town or any fire district shall not be subject to the provisions of

§ 9-21-10.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003860
========
LC003860 - Page 2 of 3